Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB771.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 102(z.5) and 206 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:* * *(z.5) The words "proof of identification" shall mean:[(1) In the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a valid-without-photo driver's license or a valid-without-photo identification card issued by the Department of Transportation.(2) For an elector who appears to vote under section 1210, a document that:(i) shows the name of the individual to whom the document was issued and the name substantially conforms to the name of the individual as it appears in the district register;(ii) shows a photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued;(iii) includes an expiration date and is not expired, except:(A) for a document issued by the Department of Transportation which is not more than twelve (12) months past the expiration date; or(B) in the case of a document from an agency of the Armed forces of the United States or their reserve components, including the Pennsylvania National Guard, establishing that the elector is a current member of or a veteran of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard which does not designate a specific date on which the document expires, but includes a designation that the expiration date is indefinite; and(iv) was issued by one of the following:(A) The United States Government.(B) The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.20250HB0771PN1624 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) A municipality of this Commonwealth to an employee of that municipality.(D) An accredited Pennsylvania public or private institution of higher learning.(E) A Pennsylvania care facility.(3) For a qualified absentee elector under section 1301 or a qualified mail-in elector under section 1301-D:(i) in the case of an elector who has been issued a current and valid driver's license, the elector's driver's license number;(ii) in the case of an elector who has not been issued a current and valid driver's license, the last four digits of the elector's Social Security number;(iii) in the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a copy of a document that satisfies paragraph (1); or(iv) in the case of an elector who has not been issued a current and valid driver's license or Social Security number, a copy of a document that satisfies paragraph (2).](1) In the case of an elector who appears to vote under section 1210:(i) One of the following forms of photo identification that shows a photo of the elector, the name of the elector to whom the document was issued and the name substantially matches CONFORMS TO the name of the elector as it appears in the district register:(A) A driver's license or identification card issued by the Commonwealth or an agency thereof.(B) A document issued by the Federal Government or by a federally recognized tribal government.20250HB0771PN1624 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) A document from an agency of the armed forces of the United States or their reserve components, including the Pennsylvania National Guard, establishing that the elector is a current member of or veteran of the United States Armed Forces or national guard.(D) A document issued by a county, municipality or school district of this Commonwealth.(E) A firearm permit.(F) A student identification card.(G) An employee identification card issued by a private or public employer.(ii) If an elector does not have photo identification as provided for in subparagraph (i), the elector may present to the election officer for examination one of the following forms of identification that contains the elector's name and the name substantially matches CONFORMS TO the name of the elector as it appears in the district register:(A) In the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a without-photo driver's license or a without-photo identification card issued by the Commonwealth.(B) A document issued by the Commonwealth, or an agency, county, municipality or school district of this Commonwealth, including a voter identification card issued in accordance with 25 Pa.C.S. § 1328(c) (relating to approval of registration applications).(C) A document issued by the Federal Government or by a federally recognized tribal government.(D) A document from a care facility in this Commonwealth.(E) A utility bill, including a bill from a cellular telecommunications provider.20250HB0771PN1624 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) A bank statement.(G) A paycheck or paystub.(H) A government check.(I) A proof of insurance document.(J) A tax filing or document.(K) A registration, fee statement or transcript from an institution of higher education.(L) A mortgage document.(M) A residential lease.(iii) An elector who is unable to provide a form of identification under subparagraph (i) or (ii) may present a qualified elector of the election district who can vouch for the elector's identity. The elector and voucher shall sign an affirmation affirming the name of the elector and that the voucher personally knows the elector. An election official shall confirm that the name provided in the affirmation substantially matches CONFORMS TO the name of the elector as it appears in the district register. The secretary shall prescribe the form of affirmation which shall include disclosure of the penalties under section 1802.(iv) An elector who is unable to provide a form of identification under subparagraph (i) or (ii) or a voucher under subparagraph (iii) may provide COMPLETE a form, prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth and provided to the elector by an election officer, on which the elector shall print their name and address, and affirm their identity. An election officer shall confirm that the name provided in the affirmation substantially matches CONFORMS TO the name of the elector as it appears in the district register. The affirmation shall include a disclosure of the penalties under section 1802.20250HB0771PN1624 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) FOR A QUALIFIED ABSENTEE ELECTOR UNDER SECTION 1301 OR A QUALIFIED MAIL-IN ELECTOR UNDER SECTION 1301-D:(I) IN THE CASE OF AN ELECTOR WHO HAS BEEN ISSUED A CURRENT AND VALID DRIVER'S LICENSE, THE ELECTOR'S DRIVER'S LICENSE NUMBER;(II) IN THE CASE OF AN ELECTOR WHO HAS NOT BEEN ISSUED A CURRENT AND VALID DRIVER'S LICENSE, THE LAST FOUR DIGITS OF THE ELECTOR'S SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;(III) IN THE CASE OF AN ELECTOR WHO HAS A RELIGIOUS OBJECTION TO BEING PHOTOGRAPHED, A COPY OF A DOCUMENT THAT SATISFIES PARAGRAPH (1)(II)(A); OR(IV) IN THE CASE OF AN ELECTOR WHO HAS NOT BEEN ISSUED A CURRENT AND VALID DRIVER'S LICENSE OR SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER, A COPY OF A DOCUMENT THAT SATISFIES PARAGRAPH (1).* * *Section 206. Requirements Relating to Voter Identification.--(a) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall prepare and disseminate information to the public regarding the proof of identification requirements established under sections 1210 and 1302.[(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1510(b) (relating to issuance and content of driver's license) to the contrary, the Department of Transportation shall issue an identification card described in 75 Pa.C.S. § 1510(b) at no cost to any registered elector who has made application therefor and has included with the completed application a statement signed by the elector declaring under oath or affirmation that the elector does not possess proof of identification as defined in section 102(z.5)(2) and requires proof of identification for voting purposes.20250HB0771PN1624 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall prepare the form of the statement described in subsection (b) and shall distribute the form to the counties and the Department of Transportation. The Secretary of the Commonwealth, the Secretary of Transportation and the county boards of election shall disseminate information to the public regarding the availability of identification cards under subsection (b).]Section 2. Section 1210(a) and (a.2) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1210. Manner of Applying to Vote; Persons Entitled to Vote; Voter's Certificates; Entries to Be Made in District Register; Numbered Lists of Voters; Challenges.--(a) [At every primary and election each elector who appears to vote and who desires to vote shall first present to an election officer proof of identification.The election officer shall examine the proof of identification presented by the elector and sign an affidavit stating that this has been done.(a.2) If any of the following apply, the elector shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot in accordance with subsection (a.4):(1) The elector is unable to produce proof of identification:(i) on the grounds that the elector is indigent and unable to obtain proof of identification without the payment of a fee; or(ii) on any other grounds.(2) The elector's proof of identification is challenged by the judge of elections.] At every primary and election each elector who appears to vote in person shall first present proof 20250HB0771PN1624 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of identification to an election officer. The election officer shall examine the proof of identification and sign an affidavit stating that this has been done.(a.1) If an elector is unable to produce proof of identification, the elector shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot in accordance with subsection (a.4).* * *Section 3. Section 1308(h) of the act is amended to read:Section 1308. Canvassing of Official Absentee Ballots and Mail-in Ballots.--* * *(h) For those absentee ballots or mail-in ballots for which proof of identification has not been received or could not be verified:(1) Within twenty-four (24) hours of a finding under this subsection, the county board of elections shall notify the voter by email, telephone or text message of the missing proof of identification and shall provide instructions on how to submit a form of identification to the county board that meets the requirements of section 102(z.5)(1)(i) and (ii) 102(Z.5)(2) via email, text message, facsimile, mail or in person. (2) If the proof of identification is received and verified prior to the sixth calendar day following the election, then the county board of elections shall canvass the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots under this subsection in accordance with subsection (g)(2).(3) If an elector fails to provide proof of identification [that can be verified by] to the county board of elections by the sixth calendar day following the election, then the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot shall not be counted.* * *20250HB0771PN1624 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall not apply to elections held prior to the 2027 primary election.Section 5. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20250HB0771PN1624 - 9 - 123